Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10C-115.7] Plain language
billings. A bill for a new and renewal policy or a notification included
with the bill for the payment of premiums shall clearly identify each coverage
in the policy, with the price of each coverage specified. [L 1997, c 251, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next